New York, session 2025-2026, S3619.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 140.25 of the penal law, paragraph (c) of subdivi- 2 sion 1 as added by chapter 791 of the laws of 1967, paragraph (d) of 3 subdivision 1 as amended by chapter 374 of the laws of 1973, and subdi- 4 vision 2 as amended by chapter 361 of the laws of 1981, is amended to 5 read as follows: 6 § 140.25 Burglary in the second degree. 7 A person is guilty of burglary in the second degree when [he] such 8 person knowingly enters or remains unlawfully in [a building] or upon a 9 premises with intent to commit a crime therein, and when: 10 1. In effecting entry onto the premises or while in [the] a building 11 or in immediate flight therefrom, [he] such person or another partic- 12 ipant in the crime: 13 (a) Is armed with explosives or a deadly weapon; or 14 (b) Causes physical injury to any person who is not a participant in 15 the crime; or 16 (c) Uses or threatens the immediate use of a dangerous instrument; or 17 (d) Displays what appears to be a pistol, revolver, rifle, shotgun, 18 machine gun or other firearm; or 19 2. The premises is a building that is a dwelling; or 20 3. The premises is real property used as a farm operation as defined 21 in subdivision eleven of section three hundred one of the agriculture 22 and markets law. 23 Burglary in the second degree is a class C felony. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05578-01-5